src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/is/hyphenation/hyph_is.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.að3
.að1a4
.aðk2
.aðl4a
.a4f3n
.af3re
.a1fr2
.afr3í
.af1s4
.agn5ú
.a1l3e
.a2l4l
.a4m4s
.an3k2
.an1n4e
.an2n
.ar2
.ar3a4b5
.a2ra
.art1h5
.a1sp3
.as2
.a2um5a
.a4u2
.au4m
.ám4
.án4a
.á2n
.b2a4
.da4
.dam5a
.d2a1m4
.d2a1v3
.dr4
.ds4
.d1u4
.dus2t5
.e1d5ik
.ed1i
.eftir5
.e2f
.eft1i
.eigin5g
.e4i
.e4i2g
.eig1i
.ei4g3i4n
.eink4
.e1i2n
.ekt4
.e4k
.er4m
.e4r
.eyf2
.fa4
.fi4
.fjár3
.fl4
.fla4
.fr4
.frá1
.g1a2
.g1ar4
.g2as5l
.gas2
.gd4
.ge2m5
.gj2a2
.gl2
.gr4
.g1u4
.her5s2k4
.he4
.he4r
.il4
.ingj5
.i2n
.is4m2
.i2s
.ís1l2
.j2a2
.j1ar4
.ka4
.ka1l5e
.k2al2
.ka1m5e
.k2am
.kapí3
.k2ap
.k4art5
.k1ar
.k1as2t3
.kas2
.kn4
.kr4
.kur4
.k1u
.la4
.la1g5e
.l2ag
.leik5sv4
.le4i
.le4ik
.lei4ks
.lí4b5
.lu4
.m2a2
.m2aj5
.mak5r
.m4ak
.mi4
.mj4
.m1u4
.myns2t4
.my4n
.n1a2
.ní5f
.ný5f
.ol4íu.
.ol1íu
.ó1a4
.óð5al
.óð1a
.óf4
.ó2g2
.ók4
.óm4i
.ós2
.p1a4
.pl4
.ra2
.r2am4
.rí4
.róð4
.r4ú2m3
.sam1an5
.s2a2m
.sam2a
.s2k4
.s4k2i4
.skj4
.skr4
.sl2
.s1m4
.s3má3l
.s1má
.sn4
.sna2r5a
.sn1a
.sn1ar
.sp4
.spr4
.s2t4
.s4ta2
.ta4
.t1i2
.t2il3
.tí5f
.tr4
.t1u2
.tví1
.t1v
.ung3l
.unn5us4ta
.unn1u
.un2n
.unn2us
.unnus2t
.úr1
.út1
.ú4t5s
.veg4g5s
.vis2t3
.v2i
.vi2s
.yfir3
.yf1i
.ævi3s
.æv2i
.öfl3
.ögr5
.ö4g
.ör3s
.öt3u
2a3a4
a4a1b
a4a1d4
2a1á2
2a1b
ab4a
3a2b3ís
a5by
abæk4l2
4ac
2a1d4
a5dó
a4d1u
1að
4að1að
að1a
að3al
að3ar
2aðfa
að3f4
4að1fö
að3g
að3i
2aðl
að4li
4að2m2
2aðs1h
3aðu.
að1u
2að1v
2a1e
a5e4i
a4e2s
2af
af3a2ld
af2al
af3arn
af2ar
a3fá
af4fr2
af3g2
a1fj
a3fló
a1f2lu
af5ork4
a1fo
a1fr2
af3r4é
afr4u4
a5fræ
4afs3d4
af1s2k
4afs1so
afss4
af2u
a1f2ul
a1fun
3afur4ð
a2f3ur
2ag
a3g2a4u2
ag1a
ag5ál
agá2
ag5i2s
ag1i
a5gj
agn4a2ra
agn1a
agn1ar
ag2ne
ag5o4t
a1gr
ag4ra
ags4ið
a4gs
ags1i
ag4sp2
ag4stj4
ags2t
ag4ul
a2g1u
ag3æð
a1gæ
4a1h
4ai
a3ið
a4i2n
aí4h
2aj
a3jö
2ak
akaup4s
a1k2a4u2
a5ka2up
a5ká
a1ke
a5k1i2nn1i2n
ak1i2n
akin2n
akin4n1i
a5ki2s4t1u
ak1i2s
akis2t
a1kj
ak5re4i
aks4l
a4ks
4akss
a2k3u
a3kv
a5ky
a5ký
a3kö
2al
a1l2ag
4al2and
al1an
a5landið
aland1i
a5landin1u
aland1i2n
a2las4
alá4
a4le2m
a1le
a2l3e4r
al1f
a4l1g
5al1ge
3al1h
al1i2s4
al4í2n
al3kj
a2lk
al4k5s
al3k2u
al4lí
a2ll
al2l2s
alls2t4
al4lý
4alm1að
a2lm
alm2a
al5man2n
alm1an
al5m2i
a3log
alo4
a5lok
al5op
a5lóð
al4sæt
a2ls
al1sæ
al5up
a2lu
al5ú
a2l3v4
a3ly4
a1læ
a1lö
2am
am3ang
am2a
am1an
a3man2n
am3ari
am1a2r
am3ar4s
am3a4s2
am3dr
a3mí
am3k
a4m2m
amm4i2s
a1mó
am3se
a4ms
ams2i
am1t
1an
3an.
3a4na.
an1a
an3a2da
an2a1d4
4an2ag
2an2al2
4an2a4u2
2a1ná
4and.
and1e
4an4dí
andr4
4an3dö
4a1ne
an5e4i
2ang
an4g1a
ang1d
an4gj
ang5sp1i
ang4sp2
an4gs
an2g3ö4
4an4i1b
a4n1i
4anið
an5í2n
2ank2
ank5l2
ank3v
3an1m4
ann5d
an2n
4ann1f2
4ann1h
ann1k2
4ann1l2
4anns
anns2k4
4an4o
ans2t4
an3st1i
an3tí
3an1u
4anú
4a1ný
4a1næ
4anö
2a3o
2a3ó
2ap
ap3al
ap1a
a3pe4r
a3p2il
ap1i
a3po
a5pre
ap3te
a5p4un
ap1u
a5pör
1ar
3ar.
ar3af2u
a2ra
ar2af
ara5kr
ar2ak
ar3ang
ar1an
4ara4n1i
ar4arp
1a4r3ar
ar2as2
ar5a2st.
ar1as2t
ar3a4u2
2ará4
4a1r4áð
5ar3ák
3ar3ár
3ar1ás
ar1át
3ar1d2
4ar2dí
4arð.
ar4ð
arð4ar5á4
arð1a
arð1ar
4arð1i
4arðs
3arðu.
arð1u
2are
3ar1e2f
4ar4ef.
5ar3e4i2g
are4i
5are1i2n
a3re4k
ar3e2l
ar3e2n
ar5e4r
a3ret
4a1r4é
2arf
3ar1fe
3ar1fé
arfs3k
ar1f1u
ar3gj
ar4græ
ar1gr
ar4gs4
arg3sl
4ar5ið
4ar4if
a4r3i2n
ar4ind
ar5i2st.
ari2s
aris2t
4a5r2i4t
4a1rí
ar3j4
4ark.
ark4i2s
ar5kj
ar3kr4
4ar4ms
ar3mú
4ar4na.
arn1a
4aroð
aro4
4arol
4ar4o4t
2aró
2arp
4ar2ra
arr2i
arr4u
ar4sá4
3ar1se
ar1s2k
ar4sp1i
ar1sp2
ar1s2t4
5ars1tí
ar3s2u
ar5t2il
art1i
artr2
ar5tr1að
art2ra
ar3u
ar4uð
4ar4ug
5aru2m
2ar1ú
a5r2ús
ar3v4
ar3yf
4arý
2aræ
a3ræð
ar5æv
4arö
as2
4a1sa
a2s3an
2a3sá4
4a1se
4a1sé
2as1i
a5sinn1a
as1i2n
asin2n
2a1sj
4a1s2k
2asl
a3sl2ag
asla2
2a1s1m2
4asn
4a1so
4a1só4
2a1sp2
aspí2t4
4ass
as1s4v4
1as2t
4ast2að
as4ta
ast4and
ast1an
4ast2a4u2
4a1ste
4a1sté
4a1st4i2g
ast1i
4as4t1i2n
ast4ing
4astir4ð
4a1s1tí
4a1stj4
a4st3l
4a1sto4
2a1stó
4astrá
ast2r
ast5r4áð
4a3strí
4a3stræ
4aströ
4ast2ul
a2s4t1u
4a3st4un
4a1st2ú
4a3sty
4a1stæ
4a1s4tö
2a1s1u
2a1sv4
4a1s4y
2a3s4ý
4a1sæ
2a1sö
2at
at3að
a3t2ak
a3t2al
at4an1v
at1an
a4t1a4r
a1te
a2t3ey
3at1h
a1t2il
at1i
a3tj
3at1k
atn2s3
a4tó
at2r4a
at1re
3at1ri
at2sp2
a4ts
a5t2un
at1u
a1tú
at4ve
at1v
3atv2i
a1tö
2a4u2
4auð.
auð5li
a2uðl
5a2uð4n
au4g4as2
a2ug
aug1a
au4m
aum5b2a
au4mb
aum5un
a4um1u
aun5dr
a2und
aup5e
a2up
aup3l2
a5up2p1
au4s
au1s2a5m
a2usa
a2u4t
2a1ú
2a1v
av4ar.
av2a2
av1ar
a3vir
av2i
2ay
a5yf
4az
2a1þ
a2þ6ó
2a3æ
4a5ö
á1a
á2ak4
áa5lo4
á2al
á1b
á4bu
á1d4
4áð
áð2s
áð3sn
áð3s4ta
áð1s2t2
áð2u
áð3us
á1e
áf2
á5fá
á5fí4
á3fl
áflæð4
áf5un
áf1u
ág2i
ágl4
ágr2
á4g1s
ág3v
á1h
á1i
ák2a
ák2am4
ák2ap4
ákó4
ál2a3m
ál3arf
á2l1ar
á2l2as2
á5l2a4u2
á3let
á1le
álf3d4
álf5s2k
á2l4m
álm5an
álm2a
álm5u
álp3
ál4se
á2ls
ál5sv2a2
álsv4
ál5ug
á2lu
á5lú
ál3æð
2ám
ámál5a
á1má
á3má2l
ámsl4
á4ms
á2n
án4aro4
án1a
án1ar
án2as2
án4o
á3ný
5á1næ
á3o
4áp
ár2a5g
á2ra
ár3an
á4r3ar4
á5r4é
ár3f4
ár5g
ár5k4
ár1m
árns4
árn5sl
ár2s2t
ár5t
ár1u
ár3v
á5ræ
ás5e2n
á1se
á1s2k
á2ska
á4ske
á3s4l
ás2m2
ás2t2
ást5i
ást5r4áð
ást2r
ást5rík
á3strí
á4st5v
4ás1u4
ás5v2a2
ásv4
át3að
á1te
átr4as2
át2ra
át4t1ar3
5áttin.
átt1i
át4t1i2n
átt3un
átt1u
á1tæ
á1u
á2uk4
á3ve
á3ví
á1væ
á1þ
á5æð
b2a
4ba.
baðk4
b1að
b4a4h
bak5s4l
b2ak
ba4ks
b1a2n
4ban1a
4baní
b1ank5an
b2ank2
4bans
b5ant
bar2b4
b1ar
barð4as2
bar4ð
barð1a
bar2n
bá4s
2b4b
bb3að
bb2a
bb3a2n
bb5ar2n
bb1ar
bb3i2
bb3uð
1be
bes2s4
be2s
b2i2
bið5i
bið5l1i2s
b4ið5r4
b4if1
bilj5
b2il
bi2ll5
4bin2n
b1i2n
b2is2k3
bi2s
b4it
bit2a
4bí1a
2b3ís
2b3íu
3bj
bj1ar2
bj2a
b4l2
bl4íun2n
bl1íu
blí3un
4bn
5bo
3bó4
bó4k3s
b4r2
br5að
b2ra
bra4s2
3bro4
br4u
3brú
4bum4
bur2
3bur4ð
burst5að
bur4s4ta
bur1s2t
bu4s
1bú
búf4
bú3s4ta
b2ús
bús2t
1by
1bý
bæk2i
bæn4a
1bær
b5ættis1m2
bætt1i
bætti2s
1bö
4böki
c4a
ci4
ck4
4da.
d2af4
d2ak2
3dal.
d2al
5da2ls
d2a1m4
d5ang
d1an
d4aní
d4ar2a1d4
d1ar
da2ra
d4ar4að
d3ar4ár
d2ará4
d3arf
d5arp
d4a1s2k4
das2
d2a3sl
4d2a1v
d1b
2dd
4dea
d5e2f
3deg
1de2il
de4i
d1e2n
d5eó
5dep
d1f4
d1g2
d4g1i
d1h
d1i
di5f1u
d4if
d3i2ll
d2il
d4im4
di3m2a
d2i3n2a2v
d1i2n
din1a
d2i1ne
dir3s
dí3d
d5íð
d5ín1u
dí2n
3dís
dív3
3dj4
djarf5a
dj2a
dj1ar
dj2arf
d1k2
d1l2
d2la
d2l3að
d3l2ag
d3l2a4u2
d4lið
d2l3u
d1m
d5olf
d5óð
d3óf
dó5lí
1dó2m
dóm5an
dóm2a
dó5ne
dó4n
3dór
dó2s
dó1s5e
4dq
d5rað3f4
d2ra
dr1að
dr4aðs5
d5rað1s2t2
dra4fn4
dr2af
d2r4a2ra
d4r3ar
3dreg
d5re2ip
dre4i
d5rey
d5rið1a
d3rík
d5roð
dro4
dru4
d4ræt
2ds
d5s2al
d4sjö
d1sj
ds2k2
ds4ko
ds5kun
ds2k1u
ds1l
d5snö
ds1s4
d1s2t4
d4st1i
ds4uð
ds1u
d4söf
d1sö
d1t2
d1u
d4uf4
5duft
d2uk4
d4u4mb
d2u5ræ
d4us4ta
dus2t
d3ú4n
dún4a
dút4
d1v4
4dw
1dy
1dý
d3þ
1dæ
4d4æf
4dær
3dö
ð1a
ð2af4
ð2a3g
ð2ak4
ð4al5bo
ð2al
ða2l1b
ð3a2ld
ðal4i2s4
ð4a1m4
ð3a4n
ðanmeg4
ð3an1m4
ðan1me
ða2r1a
ð1ar
ð3ar3f
ðar3l2
ðar4l1i2s
ðar2li4
ðar3t4
ð3ar1ú
ðat4a
ð2at
ð3a4u2
ð3á2
ð1b
ð1d2
ð1e
ð3f4
ð1g
ð2g1a
ð2g1i
ðg4l
ð4gn
ð2g1u4
ð3g4ul
ð1h
ð1i
ð4i3g
ð4ik4
ð3i2n
ðis5l
ði2s
ðis2t4
ð4is4ta
ðis4ve
ðis1v4
ðj3as4
ðj2a
ð3jó
ð4j1u
ð3ke
ð1kr
ðk2un
ð2k1u
ð3kun2n
ð1kv
ð1lá
ðl2i2n
ðl4is2t
ðl1i2s
ð3lí
ðl4ur
ð2lu
ð1læ
ð1m2
ðnum4
ðn1u
ð3o
ð3ó
ð1p2
ðr5át
ð1re
ð1r4é
ð3r4ik
ð3rík
ð5ró
ðr1u
ð3rú
ð1ræ
ðræði2s5
ðræð1i
ðs5afl
ðs2af
ðs5á4
ð4seg
ð1se
ðs4in2n
ðs1i
ðs1i2n
ð1s2k
ðskr4
ð4skú2
ð2s5kv
ð4skö
ðs4lu
ð2so
ð2s3or
ðss4
ð1s2t2
ð2s1tí
ð3s4tö
ðs4u
ð4sv2i
ðsv4
ð2sæ
ð1t4
ð1u
ð3uð
ð3ug
ð3u2ll
ð2ul
ð5u2ls
ð5un2n
ð3un1u
ð3ur
ð2ur5á
ður3f
ður5g4
ður5s2t
ð1v
ðv5að
ðv2a2
ðv3an2n
ðv1a4n
ðv3arn
ðv1ar
ð1y
ð5ý
ð1þ
e2at4
ebr5e
eb4r2
ed4e
e1d4ik
ed1i
ed3it
eð3a2
eð2al1
eð3il
eð1i
eð4i2s
e2f
e3f2al
ef3i
efj5an
efj4a
e4f4n
4eft.
2ef4t2s5
eg4ge
eg3i
egr5u
eg3u4l
e2g1u
egur4s
e4i
eið5ar
eið1a
eið4s2t2
e4iðs
eif4as2
e4if
ei4ka
e4ik
eik3li
eikl2
ei2k3u
eil3a2g
e2il
eil5ö
e4i2m
eim5u
eing4
e1i2n
1eink2
4ein1o
eist5að
ei2s
eis2t
eis4ta
e4k
ek2i2s
ekj5a
ekn3
e2k3u
ek5ú2
e2l
el5ás
e2l4d
el3eg
e1le
elf3i2n
elf2i
el4gr
e4lg
el1i
4elí
el3í2n
el4ke
e2lk
e2l2l
ell5an
el1l3e
elleg4
el3ó
e2l3r
el1sí4
e2ls
5els2k
el4te
e4lt
elu5s
e2lu
e2m
em4b2a
e4mb
1em1be
em5ens
e1me
eme2n
em3i4
emj3
em4l
em2l2i
empl5
em5u
e2n
4enc
en4g
eng3a
en4ik4
e4n1i
2en2n
enn4t
en4t
ep4h
ep3i
epl5i
epl2
e4pr
ep4t
e4r
er3al
e2ra
er5a4u2
er5á
4er4ð
5ere
er5et
erf5ar
er2fr2
erf3u
erg5l4
er4gr
er3i
er2k
er4la
er1l2
er2l3i4
er4lí
er4m2i
erm5i2n
er5ól
er5skj
ers2k
er1un
er2v
er3ö
eröf4
e2s
es3a
es4b1a2n
es1b
esb2a
es4bu
4e1sj
e5ske
es2k
4e1so
esp3a
e1sp2
es2s
est3að
es2t
es4ta
e1s4t5ö
e3sæ
et4ik4
et1i
et5i2ls
et2il
etn1a4
et5o4
etr5an
et2ra
etr3u
et2ul4
et1u
et2us
ext4u
5ey4r3ar
ey2ra
é3b
é1d
éð2s
é3fe
é1g4
é5ky
é1l
él2a4g
él4a2ra
é2l1ar
é2li
é4lj
é2l3r
ér1
ér4á
ér4r
érs4
ér4un
ér3v
é3s1m2
étt4ug
étt1u
ét4un
ét1u
étur4
f3að
f2a2g
f2a5k
1fa2ll
f2al
fa2l4u
f2a4ná
f1an
f2a5p4
f2ar
f3ar4ð
f4are
f4arg
fark2a5l2
f3ar1l2
f4a1st3e
fas2
f1as2t
fá3f2
f5áns
fá2n
fá3rá
fá3ta
fá3v
f1b4
fd2an
f1dr
f5dú
fð2a4l
fð1a
1fe
f3e2f
f3e1i2n
fe4i
3fe2l
f3end
fe2n
fer2l5i4
fe4r
fer1l2
fer3t
f1ey
1fé
f4fa
f2fo
f1fr2
ff4s2t
ffæ2r4a
f1fæ
f1g2
f2g1a
f2g1i
fg4n
f1h
f3ið
f4ik4
f5il.
f2il
f5ili
f3i2ll
f5i2ls
f5i2l1v
fim3a
f4im
f4i1ne
f1i2n
f3in1u
3f2irð1i
fir4ð
f3irð1u
firg2
f3irn
1firs
3f4is2k
fi2s
fi5so
f3i2st.
fis2t
f3i2s4t1u
fis5v4
fí4
f5íkv
f3ís
fj4a
fj5að1u
fj3að
fj5an2n
fj3an
fj4e
f1k2
fl3and
fl1an
fl4at
3flata
f5lá4t
f4le2n
f1le
f4l5g
1flo4
5fl2ut
f2lu
f2l1v4
4f1lý
1flö
f1m
4fn
fn1g
f5n4í
fn3k2
fn5ok
1fo
4fop
forf4
fork4
1fó
fr2
4f4ra.
f2ra
fr3að
fr2a4m
fram3l
fr5and
fr1an
4f4r3ar
2f4ri.
f4r5i2n
fr4í5m4
f3róf
fru4
fr3uð
1fræ
2f3ræk
4f1ræn
fs3á4
f4se2l
f1se
f4sk2af
fs2k
fsl4
fs3li
fs5n1a
f2so
f2s5or
fsr4
fss4
f4st1i
fs2t
f5s4tæ
fs1v4
f4sæ
ft3að
ft4a4s2k
ft1as2
ft5á4
f3te
f4t2s
fts5l
ft3u
ft4ul
f1u
4fu.
f3uð
3fugl
f2ug
fund4as2
f2und
2f3ur
5furð2ul
fur4ð
furð1u
f2ur5e
furs4
fur3t
4f2us
f5u2st.
fus2t
f3u2s4t1u
f1v4
1fy
f3yrt
f1þ
1fæ
1fö
för4l2
g1a
4ga.
4g3að
gaf4ar
g2af
gagl4
g2ag
3gagn
g2ak4
ga4l2ag
g2al
gal4i2s4
5ga2ls
5ga4lt
gam3al
g2am
gam2a
gam4i
g5and
g1an
1g2ang
gap4a
g2ap
g4ard.
g1ar
g3ar1d2
g2ar4ð
3g4arð.
3garð1a
3g4arð1i
3g4arð4s
5garð3ur
garð1u
g3ar3f
gar4kl2
gar3l2
gar3t
4gas2
g4as.
g4así
g3a2st.
g1as2t
g4a5st2að
gas4ta
1gata
g2at
gat4r
gá2
3gáf2
gá5le
g1b
gd4ans
gd1an
g3de
g4d1u
gd4v4
gð4aro4
gð1a
gð1ar
1ge
3ge4i
2g1e2l
ge2n4
g5end
3gen4g
g3en4t
5g4er4ð
ge4r
ger5í
germ4
gerv5a2
ger2v
get3r
g1f2
ggi2s5
gg1i
ggj2af3
ggj2a
ggj5ar
gg5rá
gg3ræ
ggs4v4
g4gs
gg3ug
g2g1u
gg2v
g4gö4
g1h
g1i
4gi.
4g4ik
gi5kv
3gi2ld
g2il
g5i2ll
5gi4lt
gim4a
g4im
4g3i4n
g2is4a
gi2s
g4i1sp2
g5i1stæ
gis2t
gí2r5a
gís4
gjaf5ar
gj2a
gj2af
gja1f5o
gj2ak4
gj2al4
gj4as4ta
gjas4
gj3as2t
1gjö
g1k4
gk2al4
g1lá
g4leð
g1le
g3leg
gl5é
gl3f2
g3l2it
g5lí2n
gl3ót
gls2k4
g2ls
3glugg
g2lu
gl2ug
glu3s
gl4y4
g3lær
g1m4
gn2ap4
gn1a
gnart4
gn1ar
g4ná
gn3g
g3nó
gn4se
gn5ug
gn1u
g4ný.
g1ný
3gol
g3or
3góð
gór5
gó4ur
gó1u
g1p
g3r2ak4
g2ra
gr4an
gra2s2
gras5s4v4
gr4ass
g2rá
1gre4i
g3rei2s
g5reyð
gr2i
2g4ri.
grið4
g3rík
3gró
3gr2und
3grun2n
g3ræð1i
g2ræn
4gs
gs1á4
g4se4i
g1se
gs2k4
gs4le2n
gs1le
gs2l2u
gs4lö
gs3m2
g2s5or
g1so
gs3s4
gs4s1i
gs1v4
gt3að
g3te
g4t4s
2g1u
g4uð1i
g2uðl4
5g2uðs
guð4só4
g3uð1u
5guf1u
g4uf
gu4lag1i
g2ul
g4u1l2ag
g5ul1i2n
g3u2ll
g3u2ls
gu5mið
g4umi
g3un
gurf4
gur3g
g4us4ta
gus2t
g3ú
gús4t5a
g2ús
gús2t
g1v
g2v2a2
g3v2al
5gyð
g1þ
1gæ
gæð4as2
gæð1a
gæ2l4
gær3
1gö4
h2a4
4ha.
h1að4
haf4sp2
h2af
hand5r4
h1an
hat3r
h2at
há3g
hál4
há3re
há4s4k2i
há1s2k
há5s4ta
hás2t2
h4ás4u4
hát4
há5t1i
hátr4
há1v
he4
he4i2
hell1i2s5
he2l
he2l2l
hen2r
he2n
her2k4
he4r
her3l4
hers2k4
4hersla2
hey5s2t
hey2s
4hg
h4i
h4i2g4
hi4m5b
h4im
h1i2n4
hit4as2
h2it
hit4n
2hí2
h5í1a
hí5b
hj4
h2l2
4hl.
4h2ls
h2lu4
h4n2
hnj2a4
hnjá3l4
hol2l3u
ho2ll
horm5
hó2
hó1m5e
hót3
hr4
4hs
hu4
hug1r
h2ug
hu2g3u
hul5i
h2ul
hundr4
h2und
hú2
h4ú2m3
4húr
hús5k
h2ús
hv4
hv1ar4
hv2a2
hv4ik3
hv2i
5hy
hæf5a
h4æf
hætt4us
hætt1u
hös2t3
hö4s
2ia
i5as2
4i5á
4i1b
i2b4b3
ibl3í
ib4l2
4ic
2id4
i3da
i1de
i3dr
1ið.
4ið3f4
2ið3g
ið5jar4ð
iðj2a
iðj1ar
4iðr
4iðs
ið5s2al
2ið1u
4ie
i3e2f
4if
if5arn
if2ar
if2at4
i2fe2n
i1fe
if4g2
if3i2s
if4t
i4fy
4i2g
ig2a3m
ig1a
igð5u
ig1e2n4
i1ge
ig5rí
2i1h
2ii
i5ið
4ij
4ik
ik5á
ik3i
ik4i2s
ikt5o4
i4kvö
2il
il2a2g
il4a2ra
i2l1ar
i1lá
4i1le
ilf4a
il1f2i
i4l1g4
i5l2ið1u
il5i2n
il3ip
il5ís
ilí4um
il1íu
il4kv
i2lk
il3l2ag
i2ll
ill5an
il3lá
i1lo4
il4sa
i2ls
il1s2k
il3sn
ils2t4
ilæk4
i5lön
4im
i4m4b
imb3u
im3i
im4ið
im4la
im1l
i4m4m
i5mó
